Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.114

Merger or consolidation.

A corporation organized under this chapter may merge or consolidate with another corporation, domestic or foreign, organized to render the same specific professional services, only if every shareholder of each corporation is eligible to be a shareholder of the surviving or new corporation.

[ 1998 c 293 s 6; 1983 c 51 s 8.]